Florida, session 2026, SB692.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 32 33 Section 1.âSubsection (4) of section 282.3185, Florida 34 Statutes, is amended to read: 35 282.3185âLocal government cybersecurity.â 36 (4)âCYBERSECURITY STANDARDS.â 37 (a)1.âA local government may only adopt cybersecurity 38 standards that are Each local government shall adopt 39 cybersecurity standards that safeguard its data, information 40 technology, and information technology resources to ensure 41 availability, confidentiality, and integrity. The cybersecurity 42 standards must be consistent with the standards and processes 43 established by the department through the Florida Digital 44 Service pursuant to s. 282.318 generally accepted best practices 45 for cybersecurity, including the National Institute of Standards 46 and Technology Cybersecurity Framework. The department may not 47 delegate the authority to set cybersecurity standards to a local 48 government. 49 2.âUnless otherwise required by state or federal laws or 50 regulations, a vendor must comply with cybersecurity standards 51 that are consistent with the standards and processes established 52 by the National Institute of Standards and Technology (NIST) 53 Cybersecurity Framework 2.0. For purposes of this subparagraph, 54 âvendorâ means a sole proprietorship, partnership, corporation, 55 trust, estate, cooperative, association, or other commercial 56 entity. 57 (b)âThis subsection preempts any prior cybersecurity 58 standards or processes adopted by a local government which are 59 inconsistent with this subsection Each county with a population 60 of 75,000 or more must adopt the cybersecurity standards 61 required by this subsection by January 1, 2024. Each county with 62 a population of less than 75,000 must adopt the cybersecurity 63 standards required by this subsection by January 1, 2025. 64 (c)âEach municipality with a population of 25,000 or more 65 must adopt the cybersecurity standards required by this 66 subsection by January 1, 2024. Each municipality with a 67 population of less than 25,000 must adopt the cybersecurity 68 standards required by this subsection by January 1, 2025. 69 (d)âEach local government shall notify the Florida Digital 70 Service of its compliance with this subsection as soon as 71 possible. 72 Section 2.âSection 768.401, Florida Statutes, is created to 73 read: 74 768.401âLimitation on liability for cybersecurity 75 incidents.â 76 (1)âAs used in this section, the term: 77 (a)ââCovered entityâ means a sole proprietorship, 78 partnership, corporation, trust, estate, cooperative, 79 association, or other commercial entity. 80 (b)ââCybersecurity standards or frameworksâ means one or 81 more of the following: 82 1.âThe National Institute of Standards and Technology 83 (NIST) Cybersecurity Framework 2.0; 84 2.âNIST special publication 800-171; 85 3.âNIST special publications 800-53 and 800-53A; 86 4.âThe Federal Risk and Authorization Management Program 87 security assessment framework; 88 5.âThe Center for Internet Security (CIS) Critical Security 89 Controls; 90 6.âThe International Organization for 91 Standardization/International Electrotechnical Commission 27000 92 series (ISO/IEC 27000) family of standards; 93 7.âHITRUST Common Security Framework (CSF); 94 8.âService Organization Control Type 2 Framework (SOC 2); 95 9.âSecure Controls Framework; or 96 10.âOther similar industry frameworks or standards. 97 (c)ââDisaster recoveryâ has the same meaning as in s. 98 282.0041. 99 (d)ââLocal governmentâ means a county, a municipality, or 100 other political subdivision of this state. 101 (e)ââPersonal informationâ has the same meaning as in s. 102 501.171. 103 (f)ââThird-party agentâ means an entity that has been 104 contracted to maintain, store, or process personal information 105 on behalf of a covered entity. 106 (2)âA local government is not liable in connection with a 107 cybersecurity incident if the local government has implemented 108 one or more policies that substantially comply with 109 cybersecurity standards or align with cybersecurity frameworks, 110 disaster recovery plans for cybersecurity incidents, and multi 111 factor authentication. 112 (3)âA covered entity or a third-party agent that acquires, 113 maintains, stores, processes, or uses personal information has a 114 presumption against liability in a class action resulting from a 115 cybersecurity incident if the covered entity or the third-party 116 agent has a cybersecurity program that does all of the 117 following, as applicable: 118 (a)âSubstantially complies with s. 501.171(3)-(6), as 119 applicable. 120 (b)âHas implemented: 121 1. One or more policies that substantially comply with 122 cybersecurity standards or align with cybersecurity frameworks, 123 a disaster recovery plan for cybersecurity incidents, and multi 124 factor authentication; or 125 2.âIf regulated by the state or Federal Government, or 126 both, or if otherwise subject to the requirements of any of the 127 following laws and regulations, a cybersecurity program that 128 substantially complies with the current version of such laws and 129 regulations, as applicable: 130 a.âThe Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act 131 of 1996 security requirements in 45 C.F.R. part 160 and part 164 132 subparts A and C. 133 b.âTitle V of the Gramm-Leach-Bliley Act of 1999, Pub. L. 134 No. 106-102, as amended, and its implementing regulations. 135 c.âThe Federal Information Security Modernization Act of 136 2014, Pub. L. No. 113-283. 137 d.âThe Health Information Technology for Economic and 138 Clinical Health Act requirements in 45 C.F.R. parts 160 and 164. 139 e.âThe Criminal Justice Information Services (CJIS) 140 Security Policy. 141 f.âOther similar requirements mandated by state or federal 142 laws or regulations. 143 (4)âA covered entityâs or a third-party agentâs 144 cybersecurity programâs compliance with paragraph (3)(b) may be 145 demonstrated by providing documentation or other evidence of an 146 assessment, conducted internally or by a third-party, reflecting 147 that the covered entityâs or third-party agentâs cybersecurity 148 program has implemented the requirements of that paragraph. 149 (5)âA covered entity or a third-party agent must update its 150 cybersecurity program to incorporate any revisions of relevant 151 frameworks or standards or of applicable state or federal laws 152 or regulations within 1 year after the latest publication date 153 stated in any such revisions in order to retain protection from 154 liability. 155 (6)âThis section does not establish a private cause of 156 action. 157 (7)âIf a civil action is filed against a local government, 158 a covered entity, or a third-party agent that failed to 159 implement a cybersecurity program in compliance with this 160 section, the fact that such defendant could have obtained a 161 liability shield or presumption against liability upon 162 compliance is not admissible as evidence of negligence, does not 163 constitute negligence per se, and may not be used as evidence of 164 fault under any other theory of liability. 165 (8)âIn a civil action relating to a cybersecurity incident, 166 if the defendant is a local government covered by subsection (2) 167 or a covered entity or third-party agent covered by subsection 168 (3), the defendant has the burden of proof to establish 169 substantial compliance with this section. 170 (9)âThis section applies to any putative class action filed 171 before, on, or after the effective date of this act. 172 Section 3.âThe Division of Law Revision is directed to 173 replace the phrase âthe effective date of this actâ wherever it 174 occurs in this act with the date this act becomes a law. 175 Section 4.âThis act shall take effect upon becoming a law.